Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
ADMINISTRATION

[§342G-11] Administration. The
department shall be responsible for the administration of this chapter. The
director may delegate to any person within the department the power and
authority vested in this chapter as the director deems reasonable and proper
for the effective administration of this chapter; provided that the director
shall not delegate the power to adopt rules. [L 1991, c 324, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next